Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5239XS (4) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2093 Section 1. Section 29C.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. After finding a disaster exists or is threatened, 3 proclaim a state of disaster emergency. This proclamation 4 shall be in writing, indicate the area affected and the facts 5 upon which it is based, be signed by the governor, and be 6 filed with the secretary of state. If the state of disaster 7 emergency specifically constitutes a public health disaster 8 as defined in section 135.140 , the written proclamation shall 9 include a statement to that effect. A state of disaster 10 emergency shall continue for thirty sixty days, unless sooner 11 terminated or amended by the governor. It may be extended 12 in writing by the governor for 60 days or less . The After 13 that, the general assembly may, by concurrent resolution, 14 rescind , extend, or amend this proclamation. Any initial 15 extension of this proclamation by the general assembly shall 16 not exceed sixty days, and any subsequent extension shall not 17 exceed sixty-day increments. If the general assembly is not 18 in session, the legislative council may, by majority vote, 19 rescind , extend, or amend this proclamation only once and the 20 extension shall not exceed sixty days . Rescission Following 21 any rescission, extension, or amendment of this proclamation 22 by the legislative council, any additional action may only be 23 taken by the general assembly. Any rescission, extension, or 24 amendment shall be effective upon the filing of the concurrent 25 resolution or resolution of the legislative council with the 26 secretary of state. A proclamation of disaster emergency shall 27 activate the disaster response and recovery aspect of the 28 state, local, and interjurisdictional disaster emergency plans 29 applicable to the political subdivision or area in question and 30 be authority for the deployment and use of any forces to which 31 the plan applies, and for use or distribution of any supplies, 32 equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, stockpiled, 33 or arranged to be made available. 34 b. A measure dictated in a state of disaster emergency 35 -1- LSB 5239XS (4) 91 ak/ko 1/ 9 S.F. 2093 proclamation shall not do any of the following: 1 (1) Infringe on a fundamental constitutionally protected 2 right unless the measure is justified by a compelling state 3 interest, is narrowly tailored to achieve its specific purpose, 4 and is achieved by the least restrictive means possible. 5 (2) Restrict rights, interests, or activities in a manner 6 that is not neutral or generally applicable. 7 (3) Prohibit in-person interactions between religious 8 leaders or individuals who are related by consanguinity or 9 affinity with patients or residents of hospitals or health care 10 facilities. 11 (4) Authorize the use of mobile, cellular, or any other 12 digital technologies to track or surveil persons without 13 providing prior notice to and receiving consent from such 14 persons. The consent request regarding the specific terms of 15 surveillance shall be presented as a separate request and not 16 combined with any other terms requiring consent. 17 (5) Authorize the use of any drones, unmanned 18 aerial vehicles, advanced robotics, or any artificial 19 intelligence-based systems to enforce the proclamation. 20 (6) Restrict the practice of a person holding a valid 21 license to practice a health-related profession regulated 22 by a board designated pursuant to section 147.13 or by the 23 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing, or restrict 24 the scope of service delivery of a hospital, clinic, or 25 health care professional if the person or entity is otherwise 26 practicing within the scope of a valid license. 27 (7) Allow a board designated pursuant to section 147.13 to 28 restrict the prescribing authority of a licensed health-related 29 professional in a way that acts as a deterrent for the 30 professional to prescribe a medication or treatment in 31 accordance with the professionalâs best professional judgment. 32 (8) Require identification and monitoring of persons 33 who may be at risk of contracting a contagious or infectious 34 disease by virtue of contact with a contagious person 35 -2- LSB 5239XS (4) 91 ak/ko 2/ 9 S.F. 2093 in a manner consistent with known or suspected modes 1 of transmission; require a person to comply with such 2 identification and monitoring efforts including efforts that 3 infringe on a personâs freedom of association; or establish, 4 authorize, or enforce penalties for a personâs refusal to 5 participate in the identification and monitoring efforts. 6 Sec. 2. Section 135.144, subsections 3, 5, 6, 7, and 8, Code 7 2026, are amended to read as follows: 8 3. Take reasonable measures as necessary to prevent the 9 transmission of infectious disease and to ensure that all cases 10 of communicable disease are properly identified, controlled, 11 and treated. However, such reasonable measures shall not 12 include requiring monitoring of persons who may be at risk of 13 contracting a contagious or infectious disease by virtue of 14 contact with a contagious person in a manner consistent with 15 known or suspected modes of transmission; requiring a person 16 to comply with identification and monitoring efforts including 17 efforts that infringe on a personâs freedom of association; 18 or establishing, authorizing, or enforcing penalties for a 19 personâs refusal to participate in the identification and 20 monitoring efforts including efforts that infringe on a 21 personâs freedom of association. 22 5. Order Recommend physical examinations and tests and 23 collect the collection of specimens as necessary for the 24 diagnosis or treatment of individuals, to be performed by any 25 qualified person authorized to do so by the department. An A 26 physical examination or test shall not be performed or ordered 27 recommended if the physical examination or test is reasonably 28 likely to lead to serious harm to the affected individual. The 29 affected individual has the ultimate authority in determining 30 whether to submit to the recommended physical examination 31 or testing, and shall not be subject to undue pressure or 32 compulsion to submit to the recommendation. The department may 33 isolate or quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules 34 implementing chapter 139A and this subchapter , any infected 35 -3- LSB 5239XS (4) 91 ak/ko 3/ 9 S.F. 2093 individual whose refusal of medical a physical examination or 1 testing results in uncertainty regarding whether the individual 2 has been exposed to or is infected with a communicable or 3 potentially communicable disease or otherwise poses a danger 4 to public health. The length of isolation shall not exceed 5 the longest usual period of communicability for the specific 6 communicable disease. 7 6. Vaccinate or order Recommend that individuals be 8 vaccinated with a vaccine approved by the United States food 9 and drug administration as safe and effective against an 10 infectious disease and to prevent the spread of communicable 11 or potentially communicable disease. Vaccinations shall be 12 administered by any qualified person authorized to do so by the 13 department. Prior to administration of a vaccine, an adult 14 or the parent or legal representative of a minor receiving 15 the vaccine shall be provided with the federal vaccine 16 information statement for the vaccine and verbally informed 17 of the known and potential benefits and risks of the vaccine. 18 The vaccination shall not be provided or ordered recommended 19 if it is reasonably likely to lead to serious harm to the 20 affected individual. The affected individual has the ultimate 21 authority in determining whether to submit to the recommended 22 vaccination, and shall not be subject to undue pressure or 23 compulsion to submit to the recommendation. To prevent the 24 spread of communicable or potentially communicable disease, the 25 department may isolate or quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A 26 and the rules implementing chapter 139A and this subchapter , 27 any infected person who is unable or unwilling to undergo 28 vaccination pursuant to this subsection . 29 7. Treat or order Recommend that individuals exposed to 30 or infected with disease receive treatment or prophylaxis. 31 Treatment or prophylaxis shall be administered by any qualified 32 person authorized to do so by the department. Treatment or 33 prophylaxis shall not be provided or ordered recommended if 34 the treatment or prophylaxis is reasonably likely to lead to 35 -4- LSB 5239XS (4) 91 ak/ko 4/ 9 S.F. 2093 serious harm to the affected infected individual. The infected 1 individual has the ultimate authority in determining whether to 2 submit to the recommended treatment or prophylaxis, and shall 3 not be subject to undue pressure or compulsion to submit to 4 the recommendation. To prevent the spread of communicable or 5 potentially communicable disease, the department may isolate or 6 quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules implementing 7 chapter 139A and this subchapter , any infected individual who 8 is unable or unwilling to undergo treatment or prophylaxis 9 pursuant to this section subsection . 10 8. Isolate or quarantine infected individuals or groups of 11 individuals pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules implementing 12 chapter 139A and this subchapter . 13 Sec. 3. Section 135.144, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 14 following new subsection: 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. Provide a link on the departmentâs 16 internet site for qualified individuals to submit 17 evidence-based information regarding a public health emergency 18 or public health disaster and for members of the public to 19 share their experiences. The department shall adopt rules 20 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subsection, 21 including the criteria a qualified individual must meet to 22 participate. 23 Sec. 4. Section 139A.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 1. The type and length of isolation or quarantine imposed 26 for a specific communicable disease shall be in accordance 27 with rules adopted by the department. The length of isolation 28 or quarantine shall not exceed the longest usual period of 29 communicability for the specific communicable disease. 30 Sec. 5. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, paragraph a, 31 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 32 (2) The applicant, or if the applicant is a minor, the 33 applicantâs parent or legal guardian, submits an affidavit 34 signed by the applicant, or if the applicant is a minor, 35 -5- LSB 5239XS (4) 91 ak/ko 5/ 9 S.F. 2093 the applicantâs parent or legal guardian, stating that the 1 immunization conflicts with the tenets and practices of a 2 recognized sincerely held religious denomination beliefs 3 of which the applicant is an adherent or member , or if the 4 applicant is a minor, of the applicantâs parent or legal 5 guardian . 6 Sec. 6. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 b. The exemptions under this subsection do not apply in 9 times of emergency or epidemic as determined and declared by 10 the director. 11